Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1824
Federal actions; commission; powers.

(1) The commission shall have power to intervene in any case pending before the relevant federal agency in which interstate rates, service, or safety issues affecting the interest of Nebraska residents, ratepayers, or natural gas public utilities are involved, and the commission is hereby empowered and authorized to pay all expenses of investigation and prosecution of litigation instituted under this section.

(2) If any interstate rate, toll, charge, term or condition of service, classification, or schedule of rates or tolls is found to be unjust, unreasonable, excessive, unjustly discriminatory, unduly preferential, in violation of interstate commerce law, or in conflict with the rules, regulations, or orders of a federal agency, the commission may apply by petition or other proper method to the relevant federal agency for relief.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 24.